Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-705
Intersections between railroads and highways; crossing; commission may prescribe changes; cost.

The commission shall, either by personal examination or otherwise, obtain information where the railroad track at public highway crossings is crossed by wires strung over the track contrary to or not in compliance with the rules prescribed by the commission, as contemplated by section 75-703, and shall order such change to be made by the person who owns or operates such wires as it may deem necessary to make the wires comply with such rules and within such reasonable time as it may prescribe. If the owner of the railroad and the other interested person are unable to agree as to which party shall bear the cost of any part of any such changes, the commission shall decide and determine which party shall bear the cost of such changes at public highway crossings.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 5, p. 1422;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 117.